District of Columbia statutes.
1-541.02

Healthy food and beverage standards for District government property.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules establishing healthy food and beverage nutrition and procurement standards that are guided by the General Services Administration document “Health and Sustainability Guidelines for Federal Concessions and Vending Operations” for all District agencies no later than one year following February 26, 2015.

(b)

The standards shall consider both positive and negative contributions of nutrients, ingredients, and foods to diets, including calories, portion size, saturated fat, trans fat, sodium, sugar, and the presence of fruits, vegetables, whole grains, and nutrients of concern in Americans’ diets.

(c)

The standards shall apply to foods and beverages purchased or served by District agencies, including at meetings, events, in vending machines, and through onsite vendors, with the exception of food served by the Department of Corrections and the Department of Behavioral Health to persons who reside at their institutions or are in their direct custody. No less than 50% of all foods and beverages shall be healthy, as guided by the General Services Administration document “Health and Sustainability Guidelines for Federal Concessions and Vending Operations”.

(d)

The standards shall not apply to food to be served to children in schools, but may apply to food served to adults in schools if that food is separate and different from the food served to children.

(e)

Exemptions may be allowed for those circumstances in which the individuals consuming the food have specific dietary needs.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 1093, 61 DCR 9990
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1093 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1093 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1093 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).